Connecticut, session 2026, HB05470.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 22a-201d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, (1) "zero-emission school bus" has the same
meaning as provided in 42 USC 16091(a)(8), as amended from time to
time, (2) "alternative fuel school bus" means a school bus that reduces
emissions and is operated entirely or in part using liquefied natural gas,
compressed natural gas, hydrogen, propane or biofuels, (3) "hybrid
school bus" means a school bus that uses (A) a combustion engine fueled
by gasoline, diesel, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas,
hydrogen, propane or biofuels, and (B) an electric motor capable of
propelling the bus that is powered by an electric battery or battery pack,
to provide vehicle propulsion from either the combustion engine or the
electric motor, or both, and [(3)] (4) "environmental justice community"
has the same meaning as provided in subsection (a) of section 22a-20a.
HB5470 / File No. 422 1

HB5470 File No. 422
(b) [Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, (1) on] On
and after January 1, [2035] 2040, one hundred per cent of the school
buses that provide transportation for all school districts in the state shall
be zero-emission school buses, [or] alternative fuel school buses [, and
(2) on and after January 1, 2040, one hundred per cent of the school buses
that provide transportation for all school districts in the state shall be
zero-emission] or hybrid school buses.
[(c) On and after January 1, 2030, one hundred per cent of the school
buses that provide transportation for school districts entirely within an
environmental justice community as of July 1, 2022, or in an area that
encompasses at least one environmental justice community as of July 1,
2022, shall be zero-emission school buses.]
[(d)] (c) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
shall establish and administer a grant program for the purpose of
providing matching funds necessary for municipalities, school districts
and school bus operators to submit federal grant applications [in order]
to maximize federal funding for the purchase or lease of zero-emission
school buses, alternative fuel school buses, hybrid school buses and
electric vehicle charging or fueling infrastructure. Applications for such
grants shall be filed with the commissioner at such time and in such
manner as the commissioner prescribes. The commissioner shall give
preference to applications concerning the purchase or lease of a zero-
emission school bus that will be operated primarily in an environmental
justice community. The commissioner shall determine the amount a
municipality, school district or school bus operator shall be required to
provide to match such grant.
[(e)] (d) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
shall, within available funds and appropriations, provide
administrative and technical assistance to municipalities, school
districts and school bus operators that are transitioning to the use of
zero-emission school buses, [applying] alternative fuel school buses and
hybrid school buses that apply for federal grants for such buses and for
installing electric vehicle charging and fueling infrastructure.
HB5470 / File No. 422 2

HB5470 File No. 422
Sec. 2. Subsection (h) of section 22a-202 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(h) There is established an account to be known as the "Connecticut
hydrogen and electric automobile purchase rebate program account",
which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain
any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in
the account shall be expended by the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection for the purposes of (1) administering the
Connecticut Hydrogen and Electric Automobile Purchase Rebate
program and the voucher program established pursuant to section 22a-
201e, and (2) paying the staffing needs associated with administering
the grant program for zero-emission buses, alternative fuel school buses
and hybrid school buses and providing administrative and technical
assistance for such grant program pursuant to section 22a-201d, as
amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 22a-201d
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 22a-202(h)
ET Joint Favorable
HB5470 / File No. 422 3

HB5470 File No. 422
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Local and Regional School Potential See Below See Below
Districts Savings
Explanation
Section 1 delays (until January 1, 2040) the requirement for all school
buses to be zero-emission and allows alternative fuel and hybrid buses
to be considered compliant. The requirement is delayed for 10 years for
school districts in an environmental justice community, and five years
for all other districts. This correspondingly delays, until FY 40, costs a
district would incur in order to comply with the requirement, or allows
a district to more gradually shift its school bus fleet toward compliance.
The expansion to alternative fuel and hybrid school buses potentially
results in a savings to districts to the extent that hybrid or alternative
fuel buses and fueling costs are less expensive than no emission or
alternative fuel buses.
Section 2 expands the existing Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection (DEEP) matching grant program for school
buses to include alternative fuel and hybrid school buses and does not
result in a cost to DEEP as the expansion provides flexibility to grant
recipients.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the costs associated with alternative
fuel and hybrid school buses.
HB5470 / File No. 422 4

HB5470 File No. 422
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5470
AN ACT CONCERNING HYBRID SCHOOL BUSES.